Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202527-1301
Evidence of child sexual abuse material; restrictions on care, custody, and control; Supreme Court; duties.

(1) In any judicial or administrative proceeding, any property or material that constitutes child sexual abuse material as defined in section 28-1802 shall remain constantly and continuously in the care, custody, and control of law enforcement, the prosecuting attorney, or the court having properly received it into evidence, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) All courts and administrative agencies shall unequivocally deny any request by the defendant, his or her attorney, or any other person, agency, or organization, regardless of whether such defendant, attorney, or other person, agency, or organization is a party in interest or not, to acquire possession of, copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any property or material that constitutes child sexual abuse material as defined in section 28-1802, so long as the state makes the property or material reasonably available to the defendant in a criminal proceeding. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the review of the proscribed materials or property by a federal court when considering a habeas corpus claim.

(3)(a) For purposes of this section, property or material are deemed to be reasonably available to a defendant if the state provides ample opportunity for inspection, viewing, examination, and analysis of the property or material, at a law enforcement or state-operated facility, to the defendant, his or her attorney, and any individual the defendant seeks to use for the purpose of furnishing expert testimony.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a court may order a copy of the property or material to be delivered to a person identified as a defense expert for the purpose of evaluating the evidence, subject to the same restrictions placed upon law enforcement. The defense expert shall return all copies and materials to law enforcement upon completion of the evaluation.

(4) The Supreme Court shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the proper control, care, custody, transfer, and disposition of property or material that constitutes child sexual abuse material as defined in section 28-1802 that has been received into evidence at any judicial or administrative proceeding. Among the issues addressed by these rules and regulations, the Supreme Court should devise procedures regarding the preparation and delivery of bills of exception containing evidence as described in this section, as well as procedures for storing, accessing, and disposing of such bills of exception after preparation and receipt.

Laws 2009, LB97, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 9.